Utah statutes.
17-28-14.   Reports by executive director.

Each County Fire Civil Service executive director shall, each December, make an annual report to the county executive and the county legislative body and shall make other reports as required by the county executive regarding the activities of the County Fire Civil Service Council and System.



Amended by Chapter 158, 2002 General Session

